de: Barcode-Scanner-Formfaktor: Kompakt; Desktop-Präsentation; Eingebettet; Festmontiert; Handgerät; Freihändig; Eingebaut in Theke; Industriell robust; Mobilcomputer; Telefon-Aufsatz; Tasche; Ring; SmartSled; Tragbar; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Formato do leitor de código de barras: Compacto; Apresentação de mesa; Integrado; Montagem fixa; Portátil; Mãos-livres; No balcão; Industrial robusto; Computador móvel; Acoplável ao telefone; Bolso; Anel; SmartSled; Vestível; Outro
da: Formfaktor for stregkodescanner: Kompakt; Desktop-præsentation; Indlejret; Fastmonteret; Håndholdt; Håndfri; I-disk; Industriel robust; Mobilcomputer; Telefon-montering; Lomme; Ring; SmartSled; Bærbar; Andet
ja: バーコードスキャナーフォームファクター: コンパクト; デスクトッププレゼンテーション; 埋め込み型; 固定マウント; ハンドヘルド; ハンズフリー; カウンター内蔵; 産業用頑丈型; モバイルコンピューター; スマホ取付型; ポケット; リング; スマートスレッド; ウェアラブル; その他
sv: Streckkodsläsarens formfaktor: Kompakt; Bordspresentation; Inbäddad; Fast montage; Handhållen; Handsfree; Inbyggd i disk; Industriell robust; Mobil dator; Telefontillbehör; Ficka; Ring; SmartSled; Bärbar; Övrigt
cs: Provedení čtečky čárových kódů: Kompaktní; Stolní prezentační; Vložená; Pevná montáž; Ruční; Hands-free; Do pultu; Průmyslový odolný; Mobilní počítač; Připojitelný k telefonu; Kapesní; Prsten; SmartSled; Nositelný; Jiné
it: Fattore di forma dello scanner di codici a barre: Compatta; Presentazione da tavolo; Incorporata; Montaggio fisso; A mano; Mani libere; Da banco; Industriale robusto; Computer mobile; Collegamento telefono; Tasca; Anello; SmartSled; Indossabile; Altro
zh-CN: 条码扫描器外形: 压缩式; 桌面展示型; 嵌入式; 固定式; 手持式; 免提; 柜台内置; 工业坚固型; 移动电脑; 手机连接式; 袋式; 戒指; 智能套筒; 可穿戴; 其他
nb: Strekkodeskanner-formfaktor: Kompakt; Skrivebordspresentasjon; Integrert; Fast montering; Håndholdt; Håndfri; I disk; Industriell robust; Mobil datamaskin; Telefontilkobling; Lomme; Ring; SmartSled; Bærbar; Annet
lt-LT: Brūkšninių kodų skaitytuvo formos faktorius: Kompaktiška; Stalinis prezentacinis; Integruota; Fiksuoto montavimo; Rankinis; Laisvų rankų; Prekystalinis; Pramoninis tvirtas; Mobilusis kompiuteris; Prisegamas prie telefono; Kišenė; Žiedas; SmartSled; Nešiojamas; Kita
bg-BG: Типоразмер на скенера за баркодове: Компактен; Настолна презентация; Вградена; Фиксиран монтаж; Преносим; Свободни ръце; В плота; Индустриален здрав; Мобилен компютър; За прикрепване към телефон; Джобен; Пръстен; SmartSled; Носим; Други
hr-HR: Oblik skenera barkoda: Kompaktni; Stolna prezentacija; Ugrađeni; Fiksno montiran; Ručno; Bez ruku; U pultu; Industrijski robustan; Mobilno računalo; Za pričvršćivanje na telefon; Džep; Prsten; SmartSled; Nosivi; Ostalo
nl: Vormfactor barcodescanner: Compact; Desktop presentatie; Ingebed; Vaste montage; Handbediend; Handsfree; Inbouwtoonbank; Industrieel robuust; Mobiele computer; Telefoonbevestiging; Zak; Ring; SmartSled; Draagbaar; Andere
fi: Viivakoodinlukijan muotokerroin: Kompakti; Pöytäesittelymalli; Upotettu; Kiinteäasenteinen; Kädessä pidettävä; Kädet vapaana; Tiskiin upotettu; Teollisuusluja; Mobiililaite; Puhelimeen kiinnitettävä; Tasku; Rengas; SmartSled; Puettava; Muu
vi: Kiểu dáng máy quét mã vạch: Nhỏ gọn; Trình bày trên bàn; Tích hợp; Gắn cố định; Cầm tay; Không cần dùng tay; Trong quầy; Công nghiệp siêu bền; Máy tính di động; Gắn điện thoại; Ống tên bỏ túi; Nhẫn; SmartSled; Đeo được; Khác
th: รูปแบบเครื่องสแกนบาร์โค้ด: แบบกะทัดรัด; ตั้งโต๊ะนำเสนอ; ซิมแบบฝัง; ยึดติดตายตัว; แบบมือถือ; แฮนด์ฟรี; ในเคาน์เตอร์; อุตสาหกรรมทนทาน; คอมพิวเตอร์พกพา; ติดโทรศัพท์; กระเป๋า; แหวน; SmartSled; สวมใส่ได้; อื่นๆ
tr: Barkod tarayıcı form faktörü: Kompakt; Masaüstü sunum; Gömülü; Sabit montajlı; Elde taşınan; Eller serbest; Tezgah içi; Endüstriyel dayanıklı; Mobil bilgisayar; Telefon eklentisi; Cep; Yüzük; SmartSled; Giyilebilir; Diğer
el: Παράγοντας μορφής σαρωτή barcode: Μικρών διαστάσεων; Επιτραπέζιας παρουσίασης; Ενσωματωμένο; Σταθερής τοποθέτησης; Χειροκίνητη; Hands-free; Εντοιχισμένο σε πάγκο; Βιομηχανικό ανθεκτικό; Φορητός υπολογιστής; Προσάρτηση σε τηλέφωνο; Τσέπης; Δακτύλιος; SmartSled; Φορητό; Άλλο
ru: Форм-фактор сканера штрихкодов: Компактная; Настольный презентационный; Встроенный; Стационарный; Вручную; Громкая связь; Встраиваемый в прилавок; Промышленный прочный; Мобильный компьютер; Крепление к телефону; Карманный; Кольцо; SmartSled; Носимый; Другой
en: Barcode scanner form factor: Compact; Desktop presentation; Embedded; Fixed-mount; Handheld; Hands-free; In-counter; Industrial rugged; Mobile computer; Phone-attach; Pocket; Ring; SmartSled; Wearable; Other
pl: Format skanera kodów kreskowych: Kompaktowy; Prezentacyjny biurkowy; Osadzone; Montaż stały; Mobilny; Głośnomówiący; Wbudowany w ladę; Przemysłowy wzmocniony; Komputer mobilny; Mocowany do telefonu; Kieszeń; Pierścień; SmartSled; Do noszenia; Inne
fr: Facteur de forme du lecteur de codes-barres: Compact; Présentation de bureau; Intégrée; Montage fixe; Portatif; Mains libres; Intégré au comptoir; Industriel robuste; Ordinateur mobile; Fixation téléphone; Poche; Bague; SmartSled; Portable; Autre
sl-SI: Oblika čitalca črtnih kod: Kompaktno; Namizni prezentacijski; Vdelana; Fiksna montaža; Ročna; Prostoročni; Vgradni pultni; Industrijski robustni; Mobilni računalnik; Priključek za telefon; Žepni; Obroč; SmartSled; Nosljivi; Drugo
zh-TW: 條碼掃描器外型規格: 小巧; 桌上展示型; 嵌入式; 固定式; 手持式; 免持; 櫃檯內嵌式; 工業堅固型; 行動電腦; 手機連接式; 口袋; 戒指; SmartSled; 穿戴式; 其他
sk-SK: Tvarový faktor čítačky čiarových kódov: Kompaktný; Stolná prezentácia; Vložený; Pevná montáž; Ručný; Handsfree; Do pultu; Priemyselný odolný; Mobilný počítač; Telefónny nástavec; Vreckový; Kruhový; SmartSled; Nositeľný; Iné
ko: 바코드 스캐너 폼 팩터: 콤팩트; 데스크톱 프레젠테이션; 임베디드; 고정 마운트; 휴대용; 핸즈프리; 카운터 내장형; 산업용 러기드; 모바일 컴퓨터; 폰 부착형; 포켓; 반지; 스마트슬레드; 웨어러블; 기타
pt-PT: Formato do leitor de código de barras: Compacto; Apresentação de secretária; Integrado; Montagem fixa; Dispositivo portátil; Mãos livres; Embutido no balcão; Industrial robusto; Computador móvel; Acoplável ao telemóvel; Bolso; Anel; SmartSled; Vestível; Outro
ro-RO: Factor de formă scaner cod de bare: Compactă; Prezentare desktop; Încorporat; Montare fixă; De mână; Hands-free; Încorporat în tejghea; Industrial robust; Computer mobil; Atașabil la telefon; Buzunar; Inel; SmartSled; Purtabil; Altele
es: Factor de forma del escáner de código de barras: Compacto; Presentación de escritorio; Incorporado; Montaje fijo; Portátil; Manos libres; En mostrador; Industrial robusto; Computadora móvil; Acoplable al teléfono; Bolsillo; Anillo; SmartSled; Portátil; Otros
hu: Vonalkódolvasó-formátum: Kompakt; Asztali prezentációs; Beágyazott; Fix rögzítésű; Kézi; Kéz nélküli; Pultba épített; Ipari strapabíró; Mobil számítógép; Telefonra csatlakoztatható; Zseb; Gyűrű; SmartSled; Viselhető; Egyéb